Alaska, session 34, HB136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 42.40.350(b) is amended to read: 04 (b) Railroad utility corridors shall be of a width at least 100 feet on both sides 05 of the centerline of the extended main or branch line, unless the corporation does not 06 own or control sufficient land to allow a corridor of that width. Railroad utility 07 corridors may be surveyed by the metes and bounds method. The corporation may not 08 convey its entire interest in land within a utility corridor except as provided in 09 AS 42.40.285, 42.40.370(d) and 42.40.400. However, except as provided in 10 AS 42.40.415, the corporation may lease, subject to AS 42.40.285 and (d) of this 11 section, grant easements in or permits for, or otherwise authorize use of portions of a 12 utility corridor for transportation, communication, and transmission purposes and 13 support functions associated with those purposes, and for commercial and other uses 14 authorized under this chapter if the use does not restrict other parallel uses of the 15 utility corridor. 01 * Sec. 2. AS 42.40.350(c) is amended to read: 02 (c) Except as provided in AS 42.40.415, the [THE] corporation may lease, 03 subject to AS 42.40.285 and (d) of this section, grant easements in or permits for, or 04 otherwise authorize use of portions of rail land. However, the corporation may not 05 convey its entire interest in rail land except as provided in AS 42.40.285, 42.40.352, 06 42.40.370(d), and 42.40.400. 07 * Sec. 3. AS 42.40 is amended by adding a new section to read: 08 Sec. 42.40.415. Use of easement. (a) Except as provided in (b) of this section, 09 the corporation may not charge a fee or require a permit for an owner of real property 10 subject to an easement in favor of the corporation to use the property in a manner that 11 does not unreasonably interfere with the corporation's use of the property. 12 (b) The corporation may require the owner of real property subject to an 13 easement in favor of the corporation to obtain a permit from the corporation to 14 construct a railroad crossing within the easement and may charge the owner a revenue- 15 neutral fee associated with issuing the permit and developing and maintaining the 16 crossing. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.